District of Columbia statutes.
23-563

Territorial and other limits.

(a)

A warrant or summons for a felony under sections 16-1022 and 16-1024 or an offense punishable by imprisonment for more than one year issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia may be served at any place within the jurisdiction of the United States.

(b)

A warrant or summons issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an offense punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine only, or by such imprisonment and a fine, may be served in any place in the District of Columbia but may not be executed more than one year after the date of issuance.

(c)

A person arrested outside the District of Columbia on a warrant issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall be taken before a judge, commissioner, or magistrate, and held to answer in the Superior Court pursuant to the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure as if the warrant had been issued by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

(d)

When an application alleges that (1) an act which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult has been committed by a child, (2) the child may not with due diligence be found within the District of Columbia, and (3) if the District of Columbia is a party to article XVII of the Interstate Compact on Juveniles, the child is not known to be in a jurisdiction which is a party to such article, a juvenile officer may secure a warrant for the arrest of the child as if he were an adult. When the child is brought before the issuing court or officer pursuant to the warrant he shall be ordered transferred to the Family Division of the Superior Court pursuant to section 16-2302. If the child is found in a jurisdiction which is a party to such article and if the District of Columbia is a party to such article, he shall be returned as provided in that article and the warrant shall be null and void.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 628, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Mar. 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-73, § 2, 48 DCR 9578
1981 Ed., § 23-563.
1973 Ed., § 23-563.
D.C. Law 14-73, in subsec. (a), inserted “a felony under sections 16-1022 and 16-1024” after “summons for”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Parental Kidnapping Extradition Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-113, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7647).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Parental Kidnapping Extradition Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-137, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9918).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Parental Kidnapping Extradition Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-249, January 28, 2002, 49 DCR 1047).
The Interstate Compact on Juveniles, referred to in the first sentence of subsection (d) of this section, is codified in §